Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,177
Project, defined.

Project means an investment of at least one billion six hundred million dollars at one qualified location by the end of the transformational period for academic medical, research, education, and training purposes.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 93;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 182.